Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1995, p. 105,

§

2 designated existing Code Sections 12-3-1 through 12-3-11 as Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title.

12-3-1. Duties and powers of department as to recreational policies and programs.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Natural Resources:

To formulate in cooperation with other state agencies, interested organizations, and citizens a comprehensive recreation policy for the State of Georgia;

To study and appraise recreational needs of the state and to assemble and disseminate information relative to recreation;

To cooperate in the promotion and organization of local recreational systems or programs for municipalities, counties, school districts, and other areas of the state and upon request to advise them in the planning of recreation areas and facilities and to consult with them in the planning and financing of recreational programs;

To aid in recruiting, educating, and placing recreation workers and in promoting recreational institutes and conferences;

To help establish and promote recreation standards;

To cooperate with state and federal agencies, commercial and industrial recreational interests, voluntary agencies, and other agencies interested in the promotion of recreational opportunities;

To submit an annual report of activities and recommendations to the Governor and to notify the General Assembly of the availability of the annual report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient;

To do such other things as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purposes of this Code section.

The department shall have the following powers:

To assist upon request any department, commission, board, agency, or officer of the state in rendering recreational services in conformity with their respective authorized powers and duties and to encourage and assist in the coordination of federal, state, and local recreation activities;

To request from the various state departments and other agencies and authorities of the state and its political subdivisions and their agencies and authorities such available information as it may require in its work with regard to recreation; all of these agencies and authorities shall within a reasonable time furnish such requested available information to the department;

To make recommendations as to the operation of recreation facilities.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 337, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1963, p. 445, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 4/SB 49.)

Cross references.

- Recreation systems for counties and municipalities, T. 36, C. 64.

Law reviews.

-
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

12-3-2. Disposition of miscellaneous funds by department.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department is authorized to retain all miscellaneous funds generated by the operation of its park, historic, and recreational sites and facilities for use in the operation and maintenance of those sites and facilities. Any such funds not expended for this purpose in the fiscal year in which they are generated shall be deposited in the state treasury, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to allow the department to retain any funds required by the Constitution of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury; provided, further, that the department shall comply with all provisions of Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the "Budget Act," except Code Section 45-12-92, prior to expending any such miscellaneous funds.

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 324, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12.)

Cross references.

- Revenue to be paid into general fund, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. III, Para. II.

12-3-3. Powers of department as to projects generally.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Governing authority of a county" means the county commissioner, board of county commissioners, judge of the probate court, or other person or body of persons at the time entrusted by law with the administration of the fiscal affairs of any county.

"Governing authority of a municipality" means the council, board of aldermen, or other person or body of persons at the time entrusted by law with the administration of the fiscal affairs of any municipal corporation.

"Project" means the acquiring, constructing, equipping, maintaining, operating, managing, and promoting of recreation and accommodation and tourist facilities and services, including, but not limited to, recreation centers, outdoor recreation experiment stations, playgrounds, parks, marinas, swimming and wading pools, lakes, golf courses, tennis courts, athletic fields and courts, club houses, gymnasiums, museums, convention halls, pageants, auditoriums, stables, restaurants, hotels, motels, hunting and fishing preserves, historic sites and attractions, and any other facilities or services that the department may desire to undertake, including the related buildings and the usual and convenient facilities appertaining to any undertakings and any extensions or improvements of any facilities, and the acquisition of necessary property therefor, all as may be related to the development of recreational and tourist accommodations and facilities as the department may deem necessary, convenient, or desirable.

The department shall have power:

To acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise and to hold, lease, use, and operate any personal property of every kind and character for its purposes under this Code section. Upon request of the department, the State Properties Commission is authorized, subject to the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 50, to acquire by purchase, acceptance, or condemnation, for and on behalf of the State of Georgia, any and all lands to be used in a project as defined by this Code section. When a project is proposed for construction on any lands owned by any county or by any municipality, the governing authority or body of the county or of the municipality is authorized to convey title to such lands to the department through the State Properties Commission if the property is unserviceable or cannot be advantageously or beneficially used by the county or municipality so conveying; provided, however, payment shall be to the credit of the general funds of the county or municipality and shall be equal to the reasonable value of the lands as may be determined by three appraisers to be agreed upon by the governing authority or body of such county or municipality and the chairman of the State Properties Commission;

To execute contracts, deeds, leases, subleases, and all other necessary or convenient instruments, including contracts for construction of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which the department causes to be erected or acquired, provided that no deed, lease, sublease, or similar instrument by which the department conveys an interest in land shall be valid unless approved in writing by the Governor, the Attorney General, and the state auditor;

To accept grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof for the purposes of the department under this Code section, provided that any grant shall be upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, may impose;

To act as agent for the United States of America, or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof, in any manner within the purposes or powers of the department under this Code section;

To receive gifts, donations, or contributions from any person, firm, or corporation for the purposes of the department under this Code section;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income or as gifts, or as may be appropriated by authority of the General Assembly for any of the purposes of the department under this Code section;

To prescribe, fix, collect, and revise from time to time rates, fees, tolls, and charges for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished, including leases, concessions, or subleases of the department's lands or facilities;

To contract with institutions of higher learning for the purpose of securing qualified specialists to aid in any of its projects;

To do all things necessary, convenient, or incidental to carry out the intent of, and the purpose and powers expressed and given in, this Code section; and

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, including the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection and the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 50, the "State Properties Code," the commissioner of natural resources is authorized to sublease the Park Marina property on Lake Allatoona at Red Top Mountain State Park, Bartow County, Georgia, and the Beaverdam Marina property on Richard B. Russell Lake, Elbert County, Georgia, for terms which coincide with the primary leases between the State of Georgia and the United States Army Corps of Engineers; provided, however, that said subleases are approved by the primary lessor, the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 357, §§ 3, 6, 7; Ga. L. 1964, p. 369, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 291, §§ 3, 5, 6; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 411, 1513; Ga. L. 1973, p. 857, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1989, p. 274, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 173, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 12.)

12-3-4. Powers of department and Board of Natural Resources as to Lake Lanier Islands Development.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Lake Lanier Islands" means such islands and adjacent land located in Lake Lanier, Hall County, Georgia, which are at present or in the future may be licensed to the State of Georgia by the United States through its agency, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, or which are otherwise acquired for use by the department.

"Project" means the acquiring, constructing, equipping, maintaining, operating, managing, and promoting of recreation and accommodation and tourist facilities and services, including, but not limited to, camping sites, recreation centers, playgrounds, parks, swimming and wading pools, lakes, airports, golf courses, tennis courts, athletic fields and courts, club houses, gymnasiums, museums, concession buildings, convention halls, pageants, auditoriums, stables, marinas, piers, docks, restaurants, hotels, motels, hunting and fishing preserves, and any other facilities or services that the department may desire to undertake, including the related buildings and the usual and convenient facilities appertaining to any such facilities or services and the acquisition of necessary property therefor, all as may be related to the development of recreational and tourist accommodations and facilities on the islands as the department may deem necessary, convenient, or desirable.

The department shall have power:

To acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise and to hold, lease, use, and operate real and personal property of every kind and character necessary or incidental to the project or the purposes of the department under this Code section;

To enter into and execute contracts, deeds, leases, subleases, concession agreements, easements, and any and all instruments necessary or convenient to the project or the purposes of the department under this Code section, including contracts for construction of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which the department causes to be erected or acquired and to sell, lease, sublease, transfer, or dispose of any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein in furtherance of the project;

To accept grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America or such agency or instrumentality thereof may impose;

To act as agent for the United States of America, or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof, in any manner within the purposes or powers of the department under this Code section;

To receive gifts, donations, or contributions from any person, firm, or corporation in furtherance of the purposes of the department under this Code section;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income, as gifts, or appropriated by authority of the General Assembly for any of the purposes of the department under this Code section;

To accept and receive land adjacent to or rights of way to the Lake Lanier Islands from the State of Georgia or from any county or municipality therein, or from the United States of America, or from any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof;

To prescribe, fix, revise, and collect rates, fees, tolls, and charges for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished, including leases, concessions, or subleases of the department's lands or facilities;

To do any other things necessary or proper to beautify, improve, and render self-supporting the development of Lake Lanier Islands as provided for in this Code section, to make the facilities available to people of average income, and to advertise the attractions to the world;

To do all things necessary, convenient, or incidental to carry out the intent, purpose, and powers expressed and given in this Code section;

To grant, on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, the right to use and occupy streets, roads, sidewalks, and other public places for the purpose of rendering utility services, upon such conditions and for such time as the department may deem wise.

The Board of Natural Resources shall have power to promulgate all rules and regulations reasonably designed to accomplish the purposes of this Code section or to carry out the provisions of this Code section.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 392, § 5; Ga. L. 1972, p. 3507, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority,

§

12-3-310

et seq.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- State parks and historic sites system, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-1.

12-3-5. Authority of state to make grants, leases, contracts, and cooperative agreements in regard to public-use areas; powers of department.

The State of Georgia is authorized to make grants, as funds are available, to any county, municipality, or other local government, or any combination thereof, or to any public authority, agency, commission, or institution, for the purpose of acquiring, establishing, developing, improving, maintaining, protecting, restoring, preserving, constructing, reconstructing, or renovating any public boat ramps, fishing piers, fishing lakes or areas, hunting areas, stream access areas, fisherman catwalks, parks, recreational or natural areas, historic, archeologic or scientific sites, or other similar property for public use. In addition, these grants may be made to further, or assist in furthering, any of the services, purposes, duties, responsibilities, or functions vested in the department.

The State of Georgia is authorized to enter into leases of real and personal property belonging to the State of Georgia with any county, municipality, or other local government, or any combination thereof, or with any public authority, agency, commission, or institution, for the development, improvement, maintenance, establishment, or operation of any public parks, recreational or natural areas, historic, archeologic or scientific sites, or any other similar property for public use; provided, however, that such leases shall have the prior approval of the State Properties Commission.

The State of Georgia is authorized to contract and make cooperative agreements, leases, and rental agreements with the United States government; any county, municipality, or local government, or any combination thereof; any public or private corporation or firm; any persons whatsoever; or any public authority, agency, commission, or institution, or to arrange for contracts, agreements, or leases between state agencies, for any of the services, purposes, duties, responsibilities, or functions vested in the department.

The department shall administer all grants made under the authority of this Code section and is authorized to specify the terms and conditions under which any grants of funds are made. The use of any granted funds by the grantee shall be under and subject to such terms and conditions as shall be prescribed by the department.

The leases, contracts, cooperative agreements, and rental agreements executed under the authority of this Code section shall be entered into and made by the department acting for the State of Georgia. The department may place such terms, limitations, restrictions, and conditions in such leases, cooperative agreements, contracts, and rental agreements as are deemed necessary to ensure that the utilization of the property is in the public interest.

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 273, § 1.)

12-3-6. Federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965 - Creation of office for administration of federal funds.

The commissioner of natural resources, with the approval of the Governor, is authorized to implement the federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965, by creating within the Department of Natural Resources or within any other department of the executive branch an office to administer the federal funds available to the state and its departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, and political subdivisions.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 855, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 183, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1532.)

U.S. Code.

- The federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 16 U.S.C.

§

460l-4 et seq.

12-3-7. Federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965 - Designation of office as state agency to deal with secretary of interior; powers of head of office.

The office created by the commissioner of natural resources under Code Section 12-3-6 shall be considered as the state agency authorized to deal with the secretary of the interior pursuant to the requirements of the federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965, and in this respect the head of the agency thus designated is authorized, with the approval of the Governor and the commissioner of natural resources, to appoint personnel for such office, establish the compensation for such personnel, and set out the powers, duties, and authority of such office and personnel therein.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 855, § 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 183, § 2.)

U.S. Code.

- The federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 16 U.S.C.

§

460l-4 et seq.

12-3-8. Federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965 - Establishment of state assistance fund to provide matching funds for local recreational projects; limitations on use of fund; approval of projects by federal government.

The commissioner of natural resources, with the approval of the Governor, is authorized to establish a fund to be known as the state assistance fund which may be used to match federal, municipal, and county funds to acquire lands for recreational purposes and to improve, expand, develop, or construct outdoor recreation facilities. Such fund cannot be used to finance more than 25 percent of the total cost of each local project for such purpose, and each local authority improving, expanding, developing, or constructing such local outdoor recreation facilities shall be required to finance at least 25 percent of the total cost of each such project before any state funds can be utilized. No state funds shall be available to such local units unless such projects shall be approved by the federal government.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 855, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1532.)

12-3-9. Adoption and promulgation by Board of Natural Resources of rules and regulations regarding parks, historic sites, and recreational areas.

The Board of Natural Resources is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to:

The use or occupancy of state parks, historic sites, and recreational areas; and

The protection of the health, safety, and welfare of persons using state parks, historic sites, and recreational areas, and the protection of state property thereon, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to repeal, diminish, or supersede the authority of the Department of Public Health to promulgate rules and regulations for the protection of the public health.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to give additional authority to the Board of Natural Resources to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the game and fish laws of this state.

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.)

Cross references.

- Power of Board of Natural Resources to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to game and fish laws,

§

27-1-4

.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- State parks and historic sites system, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-1.

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

12-3-9.1. Discount for certified disabled veterans.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Disabled veteran" means a veteran discharged under honorable conditions from any branch of the armed forces of the United States who has a physical disability which was incurred during the period of service in the armed forces and who is a resident of the State of Georgia.

"Fee" means the charge or fee established by the Board of Natural Resources for the use or occupancy of any state park, historic site, or recreational area and specifically includes, but is not limited to, entrance or admittance fees, rental fees for cabins or other overnight lodgings, rental fees for campsites, and fees for the use of golf courses or other recreational facilities.

Any disabled veteran may apply to the commissioner of veterans service for certification as a disabled veteran as defined by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section. The commissioner of veterans service is authorized and directed to certify such applicants as disabled veterans and to issue to such applicants such proof of certification as the commissioner finds appropriate. The commissioner of veterans service may by rule or regulation require such documentation as may be necessary to certify disabled veterans as provided in this subsection.

Any disabled veteran who is certified as such by the commissioner of veterans service as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be granted a discount of 25 percent of the fee otherwise applicable at any state park, historic site, or recreational area operated by or pursuant to the authority of the Department of Natural Resources or any division or other agency of said department.

The discount provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section:

Shall apply to rental fees for cabins, campsites, or other overnight accommodations for the disabled veteran and members of the disabled veteran's immediate family who occupy the overnight accommodations with the disabled veteran; and

Shall not apply to rental or use fees for any group facilities or accommodations.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 517, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Veterans benefits, T. 38, C. 4, A. 2

12-3-10. Directing persons to leave parks, historic sites, or recreational areas upon their refusal to observe rules and regulations; prohibited acts generally.

As used in this Code section, the term "park, historic site, or recreational area" means a park, historic site, or recreational area which is operated by or for and is under the custody and control of the department.

It shall be unlawful for any person to enter upon any park, historic site, or lands managed by the Department of Natural Resources except when in compliance with all applicable laws and all rules, regulations, and permits adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-3-9.

It shall be unlawful for any person, in any manner, to mark on, deface, injure, displace, dig, excavate, remove, or construct on any real or personal property on any park, historic site, or recreational area, except when done with special written permission granted by the commissioner of natural resources or his authorized representative.

It shall be unlawful for any person to drive a vehicle on any roads in a park, historic site, or recreational area in excess of 35 miles per hour. It shall also be unlawful for any person to drive a vehicle in excess of 15 miles per hour within 200 feet of an intensive-use area in a park, historic site, or recreational area. As used in this subsection, the term "vehicle" means any wheeled conveyance for the transportation of persons or materials. As used in this subsection, the term "intensive-use area" means a picnic area, a beach or pool area, a check-in station, or a camping or cabin area.

With the exceptions of law enforcement and official use by the department, it shall be unlawful for any person to have or use a boat on the waters of any park, historic site, or recreational area in violation of any prohibition or restriction posted therein by the department. The posting of signs at entrances of a park, historic site, or recreational area designating any prohibitions of, or restrictions on the use of, boats on the waters of that park, historic area, or recreational area shall constitute sufficient notice for the entire park, historic area, or recreational area.

Reserved.

Reserved.

Reserved.

It shall be unlawful for any person to fish in waters of any park, historic site, or recreational area, except for boat fishing between the hours of 7:00 A.M. and sunset and bank or wade fishing between the hours of 7:00 A.M. and 10:00 P.M., unless otherwise prohibited. It shall also be unlawful to fish in waters of any park, historic site, or recreational area which have been closed and posted by the department.

It shall be unlawful to fish commercially or to buy or sell fish caught in the waters of any park, historic site, or recreational area.

It shall be unlawful to fish with any device other than a pole and line or rod and reel in the waters of any park, historic site, or recreational area, except with the written permission of the commissioner of natural resources or his authorized representative.

It shall be unlawful to hunt, trap, or otherwise pursue or catch any wildlife in any park, historic site, or recreational area, unless such activity involves the use of bows and arrows, primitive weapons, rifles, or shotguns and has been approved by prior written permission of the commissioner of natural resources or the commissioner's authorized representative. It shall also be unlawful to shoot into a park, historic site, or recreational area from beyond the boundaries of such park, historic site, or recreational area.

It shall be unlawful for any intoxicated person to enter or remain on any park, historic site, or recreational area. It shall also be unlawful for any person to consume or use alcoholic beverages or intoxicants in any public use area of a park, historic site, or recreational area. As used in this subsection, the term "public use area" shall not include cabins, rooms, trailers, tents, and conference facilities which facilities are rented for exclusive use by one individual or group.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use in any park, historic site, or recreational area any electronic device for the detection of metals, minerals, artifacts, or lost articles or for treasure hunting.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use or possess in any park, historic site, or recreational area any fireworks, explosives, or firecrackers, unless stored so as not to be readily accessible or unless such use has been approved by prior written permission of the commissioner of natural resources or his or her authorized representative.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use or possess in any park, historic site, or recreational area any firearms other than a handgun, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use or possess in any park, historic site, or recreational area any handgun without a valid weapons carry license issued pursuant to Code Section 16-11-129.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use or possess in any park, historic site, or recreational area any bows and arrows, spring guns, air rifles, slingshots, or any other device which discharges projectiles by any means, unless the device is unloaded and stored so as not to be readily accessible or unless such use has been approved within restricted areas by prior written permission of the commissioner of natural resources or his or her authorized representative.

It shall be unlawful to refuse to leave a park, historic site, or recreational area after violating any law or regulation of the Board of Natural Resources promulgated pursuant to Code Section 12-3-9 and after being directed to leave by an authorized representative of the department.

It shall be unlawful for any person to park a vehicle at any place within any park, historic site, or recreational area, including upon the right of way of any county, state, or federal highway which traverses the park, historic site, or recreational area, where signs placed at the direction of the commissioner of natural resources or his official designee prohibit parking or condition the privilege of parking upon the purchase and display of a parking permit. The posting of signs at the entrances of a park, historic site, or recreational area designating the places for which a parking permit is required shall constitute sufficient notice for the entire park, historic site, or recreational area.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this Code section commits the offense of criminal trespass.

The jurisdiction of the probate courts of the several counties of this state is enlarged and extended so that probate courts, acting by and through the judge or presiding officer, shall have the right and power to receive pleas of guilty and impose sentence upon defendants violating the provisions of this Code section.

When a person is arrested for any violation of the provisions of this Code section, the arresting officer may, at his discretion, choose to issue to the offender a summons to appear before a court of jurisdiction. Every such summons shall show:

That it is issued by authority of the department;

The name of the person summoned or, if the person to be summoned refuses to give his name or the officer serving the summons believes the name given is false or if the officer is for other cause unable to ascertain the correct name of the person to be summoned, a fictitious name plainly identified as such;

The offense with which the person being summoned is charged and the date and location of the alleged offense;

The location of the court and the day and hour at which he is summoned to appear;

That failure to so appear is a violation of Georgia laws and subject to prosecution;

The date the summons is served; and

The name and official designation of the officer serving it.

Personal delivery of the summons to the person charged or, if the violation is for a vehicle parking violation and the vehicle illegally parked is unattended, the placement of the summons on the windshield of the driver's side of the illegally parked vehicle shall constitute due and proper service of the summons.

Every person so summoned shall appear at the place and on the date ordered except in cases where a bond has been posted in lieu of the summons or where the court has granted a continuance.

The officer serving a summons pursuant to this subsection shall, on or before the return date of the summons, deliver a copy thereof to the court before which it is returnable, or to the clerk of such court, and shall file any information and such affidavits as may be required with respect to the alleged offense.

If the person charged shall fail to appear as specified in the summons, the judge having jurisdiction of the offense may issue a warrant ordering the apprehension of the person commanding that he be brought before the court to answer the charge contained within the summons and the charge of his failure to appear as required. The person shall then be allowed to make a reasonable bond to appear on a given date before the court.

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 1160, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1175, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1984, p. 374, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 437, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1007, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1547, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 945, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1998, p. 253, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 12; Ga. L. 1999, p. 159, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 1/HB 1490; Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 2-2/SB 308; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1074, § 1/SB 319.)

Cross references.

- Game and fish laws, generally, T. 27.

Prohibition against certain acts on public hunting or fishing or game management areas,

§

27-1-33

.

Operation of watercraft in state generally, T. 52, C. 7.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1991, p. 1007,

§

2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides as follows:
"The General Assembly recognizes the imminent need for increased funding of maintenance and rehabilitation programs for the facilities and structures of state parks, historic sites, and recreational areas and natural areas.
The General Assembly declares its intent to ensure that if the Board of Natural Resources establishes a parking permit requirement for parking at state parks, historic sites, and recreational areas and natural areas, funding provided by the sale of parking permits by the Department of Natural Resources will be used to implement programs of maintenance and rehabilitation of facilities and structures located in the state parks, historic sites, and recreational areas and natural areas.
The General Assembly further declares its intent that such funding may be used to carry out all aspects of the programs of maintenance and rehabilitation including, but not limited to, the employment of personnel and the acquisition of equipment and supplies. No schedule of parking fees shall be effective until adopted under the same procedure as the adoption of rules under the Administrative Procedure Act."

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1547,

§

3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1992, and shall apply to violations of the provisions of Code Section 12-3-10 of the O.C.G.A. which take place on or after July 1, 1992."

Ga. L. 2010, p. 963,

§

3-1/SB 308, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to all offenses committed on and after June 4, 2010, and shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before June 4, 2010, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecution.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Crimes and Offenses," see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 131 (2011).

12-3-10.1. Directing persons to leave parks, historic sites, or recreation areas; penalty.

Any person who violates any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-3-9 and who refuses to cease such violation after notice may be directed to leave the park, historic site, or recreational area on which the violation occurs. A person shall have no legal authority, right, or privilege to remain upon a state park, historic site, or recreational area after receiving such a direction.

Any person violating the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-10.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 253, § 3.)

12-3-11. Civil penalty; reports to department by clerk of court regarding disposition of actions; compensation of clerk for reports.

Any person who violates any provision of Code Section 12-3-9 or 12-3-10 or the provisions of any law administered by the department concerning parks, historic sites, and recreational areas, or any regulations or orders promulgated and administered thereunder, shall be liable civilly for a penalty in a maximum amount of $1,000.00 for each and every violation thereof, such civil penalty to be recoverable by a civil action brought in the name of the commissioner of natural resources by the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the alleged violator resides. The commissioner on his motion may, or, upon complaint of any interested party charging a violation, shall refer the matter directly to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the violator resides. The proceeds from all civil penalties arising from enforcement of such laws, regulations, and orders shall, except as otherwise provided in this Code section, be applied initially toward payment of the proper officers of the trial court as prescribed by law. The money remaining after such officers have been compensated shall be remitted promptly by the clerk of the court in which the case is disposed of to the treasurer of the county in which the civil penalty is assessed, or other officer having charge of the fiscal affairs of the county, who shall deposit the funds in the general fund of the county, such funds to be allocated to the county board of education for school purposes. The clerk of the court in which each case is disposed shall promptly make a written report to the department showing the disposition of each case. For making each report, he shall be entitled to an additional fee of $1.00 in each case, unless otherwise prohibited by law, to be added to the costs allowed by law against the defendant, to be retained by the clerk as his special compensation for making the report. The civil penalty prescribed in this Code section shall be concurrent with, alternative to, and cumulative of any and all other civil, criminal, or alternative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties provided, allowed, or available to the department with respect to any violation of the laws administered by the department and any regulations or orders promulgated and administered thereunder.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1175, § 2.)

12-3-12. Notification of local governing authorities prior to certain significant changes in services at state parks, historic sites, or recreational areas.

As used in this Code section, the term "change in services" means the:

Permanent change of a primary existing operational function;

Reduction by 50 percent or more of the hours of operation or services; or

Closure

of any state park, historic site, or recreational area operated by or pursuant to the authority of the department.

Prior to making a change in services, the department shall provide 60 days' notice to the governing authority of each municipality and county in which any part of the state park, historic site, or recreational area is located regarding the specific proposed change in services. The notice required by this Code section shall be made in writing and sent to the applicable chairperson of the county commissioners and the mayor of the municipality.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 647, § 1/HB 189.)